Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.100

Certification—Competency requirements.

The secretary shall approve only those persons who have achieved the minimum level of competency as defined by the secretary. The secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of alternate training and shall have the authority to contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession, or in education, to assist in evaluating those applying for approval. The standards and procedures set shall apply equally to schools and training within the United States and those in foreign jurisdictions.

[ 1991 c 3 s 233; 1987 c 415 s 11.]